District of Columbia statutes.
29-920

Removal of directors and officers; vote required for approval; vacancies.

A director or officer may be removed, with or without cause, by a vote of 2 /3 of the members voting at a regular or special meeting. The director or officer involved shall have an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel at the meeting. A vacancy caused by any such removal shall be filled by the vote provided in the bylaws for election of directors, if the bylaws provide for a means of electing or appointing officers that means.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(12), 59 DCR 13171
2001 Ed., § 29-920.
1981 Ed., § 29-1120.
1973 Ed., § 29-820.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.